Utah statutes.
48-1-3.1.   Joint venture defined -- Application of chapter.

(1)  A joint venture is an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a single business enterprise.

(2)  This chapter governs the property and transfer rights of joint ventures.



Enacted by Chapter 14, 1985 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

